District of Columbia statutes.
48-902.06

Schedule II enumerated.

The controlled substances listed in this section are included in Schedule II unless and until removed therefrom pursuant to § 48-902.01:

(1)

Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any of the following substances, whether produced directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of vegetable origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by combination of extraction and chemical synthesis:

(A)

Opium and opiate, and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation of opium or opiate, excluding apomorphine, dextrorphan, nalbuphine, naloxone, naltrexone, and their respective salts, but including the following:

(i)

Raw opium;

(ii)

Opium extracts;

(iii)

Opium fluid extracts;

(iv)

Powdered opium;

(v)

Granulated opium;

(vi)

Tincture of opium;

(vii)

Codeine;

(viii)

Ethylmorphine;

(ix)

Etorphine Hydrochloride;

(x)

Hydrocodone;

(xi)

Metopon;

(xii)

Morphine;

(xiii)

Oxycodone;

(xiv)

Oxymorphone;

(xv)

Thebaine;

(xvi)

Hydromorphone;

(xvii)

Dihydrocodeine;

(xviii)

Sufentanil;

(xix)

Alfentanil; and

(xx)

Carfentanil;

(B)

Any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation thereof which is chemically equivalent or identical with any of the substances referred to in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, but not including the isoquinoline alkaloids of opium;

(C)

Opium poppy and poppy straw;

(D)

Coca leaves, except coca leaves or extracts of coca leaves from which cocaine, ecgonine, or derivatives of ecgonine or their salts have been removed; cocaine, its salts, optical and geometric isomers, and salts of isomers; or any compound, mixture, or preparation that contains any substance referred to in this paragraph;

(E)

Concentrate of poppy straw (the crude extract of poppy straw in either liquid, solid, or powder form which contains the phenanthrene alkaloids of the opium poppy);

(F)

Hashish; and

(G)

Synthetic Tetrahydrocannabinols: Chemical equivalents of the substances contained in the plant, or in the resinous extractives of Cannabis, and synthetic substances, derivatives, and their isomers with similar chemical structure and pharmacological activity such as the following:

(i)

Delta 1 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers;

(ii)

Delta 6 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers; or

(iii)

Delta 3, 4 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and its optical isomers (compounds of these structures, regardless of numerical designation of atomic positions covered);

(2)

Unless specifically excepted or unless in another schedule, any of the following opiates, including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, whenever the existence of these isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation, dextrorphan excepted:

(A)

Alphaprodine;

(B)

Anileridine;

(C)

Bezitramide;

(D)

Biphetamine;

(E)

Diphenoxylate;

(F)

Eskatrol;

(G)

Fentanyl;

(H)

Fetamine;

(I)

Isomethadone;

(J)

Levo-alphacetylmethadol, also known as levo-alpha-acetylmethadol, levomethadyl acetate, or LAAM;

(K)

Levomethorphan;

(L)

Levorphanol;

(M)

Metazocine;

(N)

Methadone;

(O)

Methadone—Intermediate, 4-cyano-2-dimethylamino4, 4-diphenyl butane;

(P)

Moramide—Intermediate, 2-methyl-3-morpholino-1, 1-diphenyl- propane-carboxylic acid;

(Q)

Pethidine (meperidine);

(R)

Pethidine—Intermediate — A, 4-cyano-1-methyl-4- phenylpiperidine;

(S)

Pethidine—Intermediate — B, ethyl-4-phenylpiperidine- 4-carboxylate;

(T)

Pethidine—Intermediate — C, 1-methyl-4-phenylpiperdine- 4-carboxylic acid;

(U)

Phenazocine;

(V)

Piminodine;

(W)

Racemethorphan; and

(X)

Racemorphan;

(3)

Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system:

(A)

Amphetamine, its salts, optical isomers, and salts of its optical isomers;

(B)

Methamphetamine, its salts, isomers, and salts of its isomers;

(C)

Phenmetrazine and its salts;

(D)

Methylphenidate and its salts;

(E)

Repealed.

(F)

Amphetamine/methamphetamine immediate precursor: Phenyl acetone (Phenyl-2-propanone), P2P; and

(4)

Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a depressant effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:

(A)

Methagualone;

(B)

Amobarbital;

(C)

Secobarbital;

(D)

Pentobarbital;

(E)

Phencyclidine;

(F)

Phencyclidine immediate precursors:

(i)

1-phenyleyclohexylamine

(ii)

1-piperidinocyclohexanecarbonitrile (PCC);

(G)

Dronabinol;

(H)

Nabilone; and

(I)

Glutethimide.

History

Aug. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 4-29, § 206, 28 DCR 3081
amended by rule, 32 DCR 1097
June 13, 1990, D.C. Law 8-138, § 2(b), 37 DCR 2638
amended by rule, 39 DCR 1882
amended by rule, Dec. 7, 1994, 41 DCR 7967
June 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-320, § 301(c), 60 DCR 3390

Section References

This section is referenced in § 7-3002, § 44-1201, § 48-853.01, § 48-901.02, § 48-902.01, § 48-902.02, and § 48-1004.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 33-516.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-320 substituted “Dronabinol” for “Dronabianol” in (4)(G).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of (4)(G), see § 301(c) of the Omnibus Criminal Code Amendments Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-599, January 14, 2013, 60 DCR 1017).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 301(c) of the Omnibus Criminal Code Amendment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-44, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5381, 20 DCSTAT 1281).

Editor's Notes

Mayor to implement public information program: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 48-901.02.